Arkansas, session 2025, SB68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-101-306(d)(3), concerning indirect
supervision of veterinary technicians and veterinary technologists by a
veterinarian, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) A veterinarian who utilizes indirect supervision of a
veterinary technician or veterinary technologist shall:
(A)(i) Retain control of and authority over the care of
the animal; and
(B)(ii) Review all recordkeeping and notes documented by
the veterinary technician or veterinary technologist on the charts regarding
the care of the animal.
(B) When utilizing indirect supervision, a supervising
*JMB010*
01/14/2025 2:28:58 PM JMB010

SB68
veterinarian may authorize a veterinary technician or veterinary technologist
to go to a location other than the location of the supervising veterinarian
to provide services based on an emergency call for an animal patient.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-101-319(b)(3), concerning indirect
supervision of veterinary technician specialists by a veterinarian, is
amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) A veterinarian who utilizes indirect supervision of a
veterinary technician specialist shall:
(A)(i) Retain control of and authority over the care of
the animal patient; and
(B)(ii) Review all record keeping and notes documented by
the veterinary technician specialist on the charts regarding the care of the
animal patient.
(B) When utilizing indirect supervision, a supervising
veterinarian may authorize a veterinary technician specialist to go to a
location other than the location of the supervising veterinarian to provide
services based on an emergency call for an animal patient.


















01/14/2025 2:28:58 PM JMB010